Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-352
Adult protective services, defined.

Adult protective services means those
services provided by the department for the prevention, correction, or discontinuance
of abuse, neglect, or exploitation.
Such services shall be those necessary and appropriate under the circumstances
to protect an abused, neglected,
or exploited vulnerable adult, ensure that the least restrictive
alternative is provided, prevent further abuse, neglect, or exploitation, and promote self-care
and independent living. Such services shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Receiving and investigating reports of alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation; (2) developing social
service plans; (3) arranging for the provision of services such as medical
care, mental health care, legal services, fiscal management, housing, or home
health care; (4) arranging for the provision of items such as food, clothing,
or shelter; and (5) arranging or coordinating services for caregivers.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 5.